Utah statutes.
13-39-301.   Criminal penalty.

(1)  A person who violates Section 13-39-202 commits a computer crime and:

(a)  is guilty of a class B misdemeanor for a first offense with respect to a contact point registered with the division under Subsection 13-39-201(3)(a); and

(b)  is guilty of a class A misdemeanor:

(i)  for each subsequent violation with respect to a contact point registered with the division under Subsection 13-39-201(3)(a); or

(ii)  for each violation with respect to a domain name registered with the division under Subsection 13-39-201(3)(b).

(2)  A person commits a computer crime and is guilty of a second degree felony if the person:

(a)  uses information obtained from the division under this chapter to violate Section 13-39-202;

(b)  improperly:

(i)  obtains contact points from the registry; or

(ii)  attempts to obtain contact points from the registry; or

(c)  uses, or transfers to a third party to use, information from the registry to send a solicitation.

(3)  A criminal conviction or penalty under this section does not relieve a person from civil liability in an action under Section 13-39-302.

(4)  Each communication sent in violation of Section 13-39-202 is a separate offense under this section.



Enacted by Chapter 338, 2004 General Session

